Wyoming, session 2025, SF0112.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 33-26-801 through 33-26-811 are
created to read:
SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565

ARTICLE 8
ANESTHESIOLOGIST ASSISTANTS

33-26-801. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Alternate anesthesiologist" means an
anesthesiologist designated by the supervising
anesthesiologist to ensure supervision of the
anesthesiologist assistant in the supervising
anesthesiologist's absence. An alternate anesthesiologist
is subject to the same requirements imposed upon the
supervising anesthesiologist;

(ii) "Anesthesiologist" means a physician who
has completed a residency in anesthesiology approved by the
American board of anesthesiology, the American osteopathic
board of anesthesiology or its predecessor or successor
organization and is licensed under article 3 of this
chapter;

SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565
(iii) "Anesthesiologist assistant" means any
person licensed under this article who:

(A) Has graduated from an anesthesiologist
assistant education program approved by the CAAHEP or its
predecessor or successor agency;

(B) Has satisfactorily completed a
certification examination administered by the NCCAA or
other national anesthesiologist assistant certifying agency
that has been reviewed and approved by the board and is
currently certified; and

(C) Is approved by the board to assist in
the practice of medicine under the supervision of an
anesthesiologist or group of anesthesiologists approved by
the board to supervise the person.

(iv) "Assist" means the anesthesiologist
assistant may personally perform those duties and
responsibilities delegated to the anesthesiologist
assistant by the supervising anesthesiologist with the
supervising anesthesiologist being physically on-site;
SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565

(v) "Board" means the Wyoming board of medicine;

(vi) "Certification examination" means the
initial certifying examination approved by the board for
the certification of anesthesiologist assistants including,
but not limited to, the examination administered by the
NCCAA or other national anesthesiologist assistant
certifying agency established for such purpose that has
been reviewed and approved by the board;

(vii) "License" means a license to practice as
an anesthesiologist assistant in this state;

(viii) "Licensee" means a person licensed to
practice as an anesthesiologist assistant under this
article;

(ix) "NCCAA" means the national commission on
the certification of anesthesiologist assistants;

(x) "On-site" means within the facility where
anesthesia services may be needed including the operating
SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565
room suites, intensive care unit, emergency room, obstetric
suite, endoscopy suite, radiology suite, cardiac services
suite and recovery room;

(xi) "Supervising anesthesiologist" means an
anesthesiologist approved by the board to supervise an
anesthesiologist assistant and who agrees to be responsible
for the medical acts of an anesthesiologist assistant;

(xii) "Supervision" means the ready, on-site
availability of the supervising anesthesiologist for
consultation and direction of the activities of the
anesthesiologist assistant.

33-26-802. Scope.

(a) This article shall not apply to persons enrolled
in an anesthesiologist assistant program.

(b) An anesthesiologist assistant may perform those
duties and responsibilities delegated to the
anesthesiologist assistant by a supervising
anesthesiologist and under the supervision of the
SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565
supervising anesthesiologist. A supervising
anesthesiologist may delegate duties to an anesthesiologist
assistant within the scope of the supervising
anesthesiologist's practice and expertise and within the
skills and expertise of the anesthesiologist assistant
including the following:

(i) Perform preoperative anesthetic evaluations,
postoperative anesthetic evaluations and patient progress
notes, all to be co-signed by the supervising
anesthesiologist within twenty-four (24) hours;

(ii) Order and perform preoperative
consultations;

(iii) Order preoperative medications, including
controlled substances, which may be administered prior to
the co-signature by the supervising anesthesiologist;

(iv) Change or discontinue a medical treatment
plan after consultation with the supervising
anesthesiologist;

SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565
(v) Obtain informed consent for anesthesia or
related procedures;

(vi) Order the perioperative continuation of
current medications, which may be administered prior to the
co-signature by the supervising anesthesiologist;

(vii) Calibrate anesthesia delivery systems and
obtain and interpret information from the systems and
monitors, in consultation with the supervising
anesthesiologist;

(viii) Assist the supervising anesthesiologist
with the implementation of medically accepted monitoring
techniques;

(ix) Perform basic and advanced airway
interventions, including endotracheal intubation, laryngeal
mask insertion and other advanced airways techniques;

(x) Establish peripheral intravenous lines,
including subcutaneous lidocaine use;

SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565
(xi) Establish radial and dorsalis pedis
arterial lines and central lines;

(xii) Perform general anesthesia, including
induction, maintenance and emergence;

(xiii) Perform procedures associated with
general anesthesia, such as gastric intubation;

(xiv) Administer intermittent vasoactive drugs
and start and titrate vasoactive infusions for the
treatment of patient responses to anesthesia;

(xv) Perform epidural, spinal and intravenous
regional anesthesia;

(xvi) Maintain and manage established neuraxial
and regional anesthesia;

(xvii) Perform monitored anesthesia care;

SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565
(xviii) Evaluate and manage patient controlled
analgesia, epidural catheters and peripheral nerve
catheters;

(xix) Obtain venous and arterial blood samples;

(xx) Perform, order and interpret appropriate
preoperative, point of care, intraoperative or
postoperative diagnostic tests or procedures as authorized
by the supervising anesthesiologist;

(xxi) Obtain and administer perioperative
anesthesia and related pharmaceutical agents including
intravenous fluids and blood products;

(xxii) Participate in management of the patient
while in the preoperative suite and recovery area;

(xxiii) Order postoperative sedation, anxiolysis
and analgesia that may be administered prior to the
co-signature by the supervising anesthesiologist;

SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565
(xxiv) Order postoperative oxygen therapy,
including initial ventilator therapy, which may be
administered prior to the co-signature by the supervising
anesthesiologist;

(xxv) Order post-operative respiratory therapy
and medicines for the treatment of patient responses to
anesthesia, which may be administered prior to the
co-signature by the supervising anesthesiologist;

(xxvi) Provide assistance to a cardiopulmonary
resuscitation team in response to a life-threatening
situation;

(xxvii) Participate in administrative, research
and clinical teaching activities as authorized by the
supervising anesthesiologist;

(xxviii) Perform other tasks not prohibited by
law under the supervision of the supervising
anesthesiologist that an anesthesiologist assistant has
been trained and is proficient to perform.

SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565
(c) Nothing in this article shall be construed to
prevent an anesthesiologist assistant from having access to
and being able to obtain drugs as directed by the
supervising anesthesiologist.

(d) Nothing in this article shall be construed to
conflict with or alter the provisions and requirements of
W.S. 33-26-101 through 33-26-410 and 33-26-601 through
33-26-703.

33-26-803. Board powers and duties.

(a) The board shall review the qualifications and
determine the fitness of all persons desiring to practice
as anesthesiologist assistants.

(b) The board shall:

(i) Grant, renew, refuse to grant or renew,
suspend, restrict, revoke and reinstate licenses;

(ii) Investigate allegations that an
anesthesiologist assistant or supervising anesthesiologist
SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565
has engaged in conduct constituting a ground for revocation
in W.S. 33-26-402 or 33-26-808(a);

(iii) Conduct informal interviews and contested
cases;

(iv) Promulgate rules governing the licensure
and practice of anesthesiologist assistants;

(v) Retain jurisdiction over only those
licensees who were granted temporary or full licenses,
regardless of whether the license expired, lapsed or was
relinquished during or after the alleged occurrence of
conduct prescribed in W.S. 33-26-402 by the licensee or
after the board receives a court order pursuant to W.S.
33-26-808(c) for the licensee;

(vi) Review the qualifications of
anesthesiologists desiring to serve as a supervising
anesthesiologist or alternate anesthesiologist including
the compatibility of the supervising anesthesiologist's or
alternate anesthesiologist's specialty and scope of
SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565
practice with that of the anesthesiologist assistant to be
supervised.

33-26-804. License required; application;
qualifications; consideration of applications.

(a) No person shall practice as an anesthesiologist
assistant or represent themselves as a "certified
anesthesiologist assistant", "licensed anesthesiologist
assistant", "anesthesiologist assistant", "C.A.A." or
"A.A." without a license granted by the board.

(b) The board shall grant an anesthesiologist
assistant license to an applicant who:

(i) Has graduated from an anesthesiologist
assistant program accredited by CAAHEP or its predecessor
or successor organization;

(ii) Has satisfactorily completed a
certification examination administered by NCCAA or other
national certifying agency that has been reviewed and
approved by the board and is currently certified;
SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565

(iii) Completes an application on a form
approved by the board; and

(iv) Pays the fees set forth in W.S. 33-26-807.

(c) No person shall act as a supervising
anesthesiologist or alternate anesthesiologist without a
license granted by the board under article 3 of this
chapter. The board shall promulgate rules governing the
board's consideration of an application by an
anesthesiologist to supervise anesthesiologist assistants.
Any application shall include at a minimum:

(i) The qualifications of the anesthesiologist
to be employed, including experience;

(ii) The professional background of the
anesthesiologist;

(iii) A description by the anesthesiologist of
that anesthesiologist's practice and the way in which the
SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565
anesthesiologist assistant will be utilized, including
method of supervision.

(d) The board shall approve an application by an
anesthesiologist to supervise anesthesiologist assistants
if the board is satisfied that each proposed
anesthesiologist assistant is fully qualified to assist in
the practice of medicine under the responsible supervision
of the applicant supervising anesthesiologist and that the
supervising anesthesiologist is compatible in specialty
scope and qualified to supervise the anesthesiologist
assistants. The board shall provide by rule for
requirements and limitations on the practice by and
supervision of anesthesiologist assistants including the
number of anesthesiologist assistants who may be supervised
concurrently and the board shall not allow an
anesthesiologist to supervise more than four (4)
anesthesiologist assistants during a shift.

33-26-805. Temporary licenses.

(a) The board may grant a temporary license to
practice as an anesthesiologist assistant to a person who:
SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565

(i) Completes a temporary license application;

(ii) Has graduated from an anesthesiologist
assistant program accredited by the CAAHEP or its
predecessor or successor organization;

(iii) Has not satisfactorily completed a
certification examination administered by the NCCAA or
other national certifying agency that has been reviewed and
approved by the board and is currently certified; and

(iv) Pays the temporary license fee prescribed
in W.S. 33-26-807.

(b) Unless revoked, a temporary license is valid
until the next board meeting following the date of
issuance. The board may extend the temporary license at its
discretion upon a showing of good cause for a period not to
exceed one (1) year from the original date of issuance of
the temporary license.

33-26-806. Term of license; renewal; duplicates.
SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565

(a) All licenses other than temporary licenses shall
expire annually on December 31. An anesthesiologist
assistant may renew a license by completing and submitting
a renewal application form published by the board and by
paying a renewal fee to the board before expiration of the
current license.

(b) The board may reinstate a lapsed license if the
applicant pays a reinstatement fee and meets the
requirements for the granting of an initial license.

(c) An anesthesiologist assistant may apply to the
board for a duplicate license if the anesthesiologist
assistant's license is stolen, lost or destroyed. Upon
proof of proper identification and submission of other
information as the board may require, the board shall issue
a duplicate license bearing on its face the word
"DUPLICATE" and shall establish and require payment of
appropriate charges for a duplicate license.

33-26-807. License fees.

SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565
(a) The board shall by rule set appropriate license
application, renewal and reinstatement fees, examination
fees and fees for information verification or document
production and other services of the board under this
chapter.

(b) Fees shall be deposited as provided in W.S.
33-26-307(b).

33-26-808. Denial, suspension, restriction,
revocation or nonrenewal of license; written orders and
findings; department of family services actions.

(a) The board may refuse to renew and may revoke,
suspend or restrict a license or take other disciplinary
action, including the imposition of conditions or
restrictions upon a license on one (1) or more of the
grounds enumerated under W.S. 33-26-402(a)(i) through (x)
and (xii) through (xxxv) except that for purposes of this
section, "practice of medicine" or "practice medicine," as
used in W.S. 33-26-402(a) means "practice as an
anesthesiologist assistant."

SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565
(b) Upon a finding of ineligibility for licensure,
refusal to grant, suspension, restriction, refusal to renew
or revocation of a license under subsection (a) of this
section, the board shall adopt and enter a written order
and findings.

(c) Upon receipt from the department of family
services of a certified copy of an order from a court to
withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by
the board, the board shall notify the party named in the
court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction
of the license in accordance with the terms of the court
order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure
Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or
restricted under this subsection.

(d) If the public health, safety or welfare requires
emergency action the board may temporarily suspend the
license of any licensee without a hearing pursuant to W.S.
16-3-113(c).

33-26-809. Reinstatement of license; removal of
restrictions or conditions from a license.
SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565

(a) Except as provided in subsection (g) of this
section, any person whose license has been revoked,
restricted or suspended under this chapter, voluntarily or
by action of the board, may petition for reinstatement of
the license or for removal of any restrictions or
conditions placed upon the license pursuant to W.S.
33-26-808 not less than six (6) months after final judicial
review of a board order revoking, restricting, placing
conditions upon or suspending the petitioner's license or
six (6) months after the date of the board order if there
is no judicial review.

(b) The petitioner shall submit a petition in writing
to the board that, at a minimum, sets forth and provides
information regarding the petitioner's fulfillment of any
and all conditions or compliance with all restrictions
imposed upon petitioner by any prior order of the board or
success in correcting the conduct that formed the basis for
the revocation, restriction, conditions or suspension of
the petitioner's license.

SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565
(c) Upon receipt of the petition that contains the
information required by subsection (b) of this section, the
board shall set the matter for hearing in accordance with
the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.
The burden of proof upon the petitioner at the hearing
shall be to demonstrate by a preponderance of the evidence
that the petitioner has:

(i) Corrected the conduct that formed the basis
for the revocation, restriction, conditions or suspension
of the petitioner's license and that petitioner is able to
safely, skillfully and competently resume practice as an
anesthesiologist assistant; or

(ii) Fulfilled all conditions and complied with
all restrictions imposed upon petitioner by any prior order
of the board, has otherwise corrected the conduct or
condition that formed the basis for the restrictions or
conditions placed on the petitioner's license and that
petitioner is able to safely, skillfully and competently
practice as an anesthesiologist assistant.

SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565
(d) After a hearing conducted pursuant to subsection
(c) of this section, the board shall issue specific
findings of facts, conclusions of law and a final order:

(i) Reinstating the license;

(ii) Reinstating the license subject to
restrictions or conditions;

(iii) Removing or modifying the restrictions or
conditions of the license; or

(iv) Denying reinstatement of the license or
removal of the restrictions or conditions on the license.

(e) Any final order issued by the board shall be
subject to judicial review as provided by W.S. 33-26-407.

(f) If the board denies a reinstatement or removal of
restrictions or conditions, future petitions for
reinstatement or removal of restrictions or conditions may
be submitted not less than one (1) year after the board's
SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565
final order denying reinstatement or removal of
restrictions or conditions.

(g) Notwithstanding subsections (a) through (d) of
this section, if a license is suspended or restricted under
W.S. 33-26-808(c), the license may be reissued without a
hearing as provided in this section upon receipt from the
department of family services of notice that the applicant
has complied with the terms of the court order that
resulted in the suspension or restriction of the license
under W.S. 33-26-808(c).

33-26-810. Penalties.

Any person practicing as an anesthesiologist assistant
without a license or any person knowingly employing a
person to practice as an anesthesiologist assistant without
a license is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction
shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand
dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not more than one (1)
year, or both.

SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565
33-26-811. Voluntary and mandatory revocation;
restriction; suspension.

(a) A licensee may request in writing that the board
accept the voluntary relinquishment, restriction or
suspension of the licensee's license. The board may accept
the relinquished license, grant the request for restriction
or suspension, attach conditions to the license or waive
the commencement of any proceedings under this article. The
board shall put in writing any agreement with the licensee.
Removal of a voluntary relinquishment, restriction or
suspension is subject to the procedure for reinstatement of
a license pursuant to W.S. 33-26-809.

(b) Unless the board and the licensee have agreed to
the relinquishment of or imposition of restrictions or
conditions on a license under this section, the board shall
conduct a proceeding to suspend, restrict, refuse to renew
or revoke a license as a contested case under the Wyoming
Administrative Procedure Act.

SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565
Section 2. W.S. 33-26-102(a)(intro) and by creating
new paragraphs (xxx) and (xxxi) and 33-26-201(a) are
amended to read:

33-26-102. Definitions.

(a) Except as otherwise provided, as used in this
chapter:

(xxx) "CAAHEP" means the commission on
accreditation of allied health education programs;

(xxxi) "CAHEA" means the committee on allied
health education and accreditation.

33-26-201. State board of medicine; composition;
appointment; terms; qualifications; removal; vacancies;
quorum.

(a) The Wyoming state board of medicine shall consist
of five (5) physicians licensed to practice medicine in
Wyoming, not less than one (1) of whom shall possess the
degree of doctor of osteopathy and not less than two (2) of
SF0112

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0565
whom shall possess the degree of doctor of medicine, one
(1) physician assistant, one (1) anesthesiologist, one (1)
anesthesiologist assistant and two (2) lay members,
appointed by the governor by and with the consent of the
senate as required by W.S. 28-12-101 through 28-12-103.
Board members appointed by the governor shall serve at the
pleasure of the governor. The board members shall annually
elect a president, a vice-president, and a secretary.

Section 3. W.S. 33-26-501(a)(viii) and (ix) is
repealed.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0112